Utah statutes.
70A-2-704.   Seller's right to identify goods to the contract
notwithstanding breach or to salvage unfinished goods.

(1)  An aggrieved seller under the preceding section may
(a)  identify to the contract conforming goods not already identified if at
the time he learned of the breach they are in his possession or control;
(b)  treat as the subject of resale goods which have demonstrably been
intended for the particular contract even though those goods are unfinished.
(2)  Where the goods are unfinished an aggrieved seller may in the exercise of
reasonable commercial judgment for the purposes of avoiding loss and of
effective realization either complete the manufacture and wholly identify the
goods to the contract or cease manufacture and resale for scrap or salvage
value or proceed in any other reasonable manner.
